Missouri, session 2026, SB1748.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 573, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 573.570, to read as
follows:
573.570. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Depicted individual", an individual who, as a
result of digitization or by means of digital manipulation,
appears in whole or in part in an intimate digital depiction
and who is identifiable by virtue of the individual's face,
likeness, or other distinguishing characteristic, such as a
unique birthmark or other recognizable feature, or from
information displayed in connection with the digital
depiction;
(2) "Digital depiction", a realistic visual depiction
of an individual that has been created or altered using
digital manipulation;
(3) "Information content providers", any person or
entity that is responsible, in whole or in part, for the
creation or development of information provided through the
internet or any other interactive computer service;

SB 1748 2
(4) "Intimate digital depiction", a digital depiction
of an individual that has been created or altered using
digital manipulation and that depicts:
(a) The uncovered genitals, pubic area, anus, or
postpubescent female nipple of an identifiable individual;
(b) The display or transfer of bodily sexual fluids:
a. Onto any part of the body of an identifiable
individual; or
b. From the body of an identifiable individual; or
(c) An identifiable individual engaging in sexually
explicit conduct;
(5) "Sexually explicit conduct", actual or simulated:
(a) Sexual intercourse, including genital-genital,
oral-genital, anal-genital, or oral-anal, whether between
persons of the same or opposite sex;
(b) Bestiality;
(c) Masturbation;
(d) Sadistic or masochistic abuse; or
(e) Lascivious exhibition of the genitals or pubic
area of any person.
2. A person commits the offense of disclosure of an
intimate digital depiction if the person:
(1) Discloses an intimate digital depiction:
(a) With the intent to harass, annoy, threaten, alarm,
or cause substantial harm to the finances or reputation of
the depicted individual; or
(b) With the actual knowledge that, or reckless
disregard for whether, such disclosure will cause physical,
emotional, reputational, or economic harm to the depicted
individual; or
(2) Threatens to disclose an intimate digital
depiction:

SB 1748 3
(a) With the intent to harass, annoy, threaten, alarm,
or cause substantial harm to the finances or reputation of
the depicted individual; or
(b) With the actual knowledge that, or reckless
disregard for whether, such threatened disclosure will cause
physical, emotional, reputational, or economic harm to the
depicted individual.
3. (1) A violation of subdivision (1) of subsection 2
of this section shall be a class D felony.
(2) A violation of subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of
this section shall be a class E felony.
(3) A violation of subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of
this section shall be a class C felony if:
(a) The violation is a second or other subsequent
violation of subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of this
section; or
(b) The violation is such that the digital depiction
could be reasonably expected to:
a. Affect the conduct of any administrative,
legislative, or judicial proceeding of a federal, state,
local, or tribal government agency, including the
administration of an election or the conduct of foreign
relations; or
b. Facilitate violence.
(4) A violation of subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of
this section shall be a class D felony if:
(a) The violation is a second or other subsequent
violation of subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this
section; or
(b) The violation is such that the digital depiction
could be reasonably expected to affect the conduct of any
administrative, legislative, or judicial proceeding of a

SB 1748 4
federal, state, local, or tribal government agency,
including the administration of an election or the conduct
of foreign relations.
4. It shall not be a defense to an offense of
disclosure of an intimate digital depiction under this
section that there is a disclaimer stating that the intimate
digital depiction of the depicted individual was
unauthorized or that the depicted individual did not
participate in the creation or development of the digital
depiction.
5. For the purposes of this section, a provider of an
interactive computer service shall not be held to have
committed the offense of disclosure of an intimate digital
depiction due to:
(1) Any action voluntarily taken in good faith to
restrict access to or availability of intimate digital
depictions; or
(2) Any action taken to enable or make available to
100 information content providers or other persons the technical
101 means to restrict access to intimate digital depictions.
✓